Utah statutes.
63M-1-1216.   Powers of Utah fund of funds.

(1)  The Utah fund of funds may:

(a)  engage consultants and legal counsel;

(b)  expend funds;

(c)  invest funds;

(d)  issue debt and borrow funds;

(e)  enter into contracts;

(f)  insure against loss;

(g)  hire employees;

(h)  issue equity interests to designated investors that have purchased equity interest certificates from the board; and

(i)  perform any other act necessary to carry out its purposes.

(2) (a)  The Utah fund of funds shall engage a venture capital investment fund allocation manager.

(b)  The compensation paid to the fund manager shall be in addition to the management fee paid to the corporation under Section 63M-1-1211.

(3)  The Utah fund of funds may:

(a)  open and manage bank and short-term investment accounts as considered necessary by the venture capital investment fund allocation manager; and

(b)  expend money to secure investment ratings for investments by designated investors in the Utah fund of funds.

